Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,110
Participating provider, defined.

Participating provider shall mean a provider who, under an express or implied contract with the health maintenance organization or with its contractor or subcontractor, has agreed to provide health care services to enrollees with an expectation of receiving payment, other than copayment or deductible, directly or indirectly from the health maintenance organization.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 19.